District of Columbia statutes.
11-903

Composition.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall consist of a chief judge and 61 associate judges.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 482, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Mar. 19, 1984, 98 Stat. 65, Pub. L. 98-235, § 2
Nov. 21, 1989, 103 Stat. 1283, Pub. L. 101-168, § 138
Dec. 13, 1989, 103 Stat. 1967, Pub. L. 101-232,§ 1
Apr. 18, 2008, 122 Stat. 696, Pub. L. 110-201, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-908A.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-903.
1973 Ed., § 11-903.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. Law 110-201 substituted “61” for “fifty-eight”.